Utah statutes.
78A-6-117 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Adjudication of jurisdiction of juvenile
court -- Disposition of cases -- Enumeration of possible court orders --
Considerations of court -- Obtaining DNA sample.
(1) (a)  When a minor is found to come within the provisions of Section
78A-6-103, the court shall so adjudicate.  The court shall make a finding of
the facts upon which it bases its jurisdiction over the minor.  However, in
cases within the provisions of Subsection 78A-6-103(1), findings of fact are
not necessary.
(b)  If the court adjudicates a minor for a crime of violence or an offense in
violation of Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons, it shall order that notice
of the adjudication be provided to the school superintendent of the district
in which the minor resides or attends school.  Notice shall be made to the
district superintendent within three days of the adjudication and shall
include:
(i)  the specific offenses for which the minor was adjudicated; and
(ii)  if available, if the victim:
(A)  resides in the same school district as the minor; or
(B)  attends the same school as the minor.
(2)  Upon adjudication the court may make the following dispositions by court
order:
(a) (i)  The court may place the minor on probation or under protective
supervision in the minor's own home and upon conditions determined by the
court, including compensatory service as provided in Subsection (2)(m)(iii).
(ii)  The court may place the minor in state supervision with the probation
department of the court, under the legal custody of:
(A) the minor's parent or guardian;
(B)  the Division of Juvenile Justice Services; or
(C)  the Division of Child and Family Services.
(iii)  If the court orders probation or state supervision, the court shall
direct that notice of its order be provided to designated persons in the local
law enforcement agency and the school or transferee school, if applicable,
that the minor attends.  The designated persons may receive the information
for purposes of the minor's supervision and student safety.
(iv)  Any employee of the local law enforcement agency and the school that the
minor attends who discloses the court's order of probation is not:
(A)  civilly liable except when the disclosure constitutes fraud or willful
misconduct as provided in Section 63G-7-202; and
(B)  civilly or criminally liable except when the disclosure constitutes a
knowing violation of Section 63G-2-801.
(b)  The court may place the minor in the legal custody of a relative or other
suitable person, with or without probation or protective supervision, but the
juvenile court may not assume the function of developing foster home services.
(c) (i)  The court may:
(A)  vest legal custody of the minor in the Division of Child and Family
Services, Division of Juvenile Justice Services, or the Division of Substance
Abuse and Mental Health; and
(B)  order the Department of Human Services to provide dispositional
recommendations and services.
(ii)  For minors who may qualify for services from two or more divisions
within the Department of Human Services, the court may vest legal custody with
the department.
(iii) (A)  A minor who is committed to the custody of the Division of Child
and Family Services on grounds other than abuse or neglect is subject to the
provisions of Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 4, Minors in Custody on Grounds Other
Than Abuse or Neglect, and Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Part 2A, Minors in Custody
on Grounds Other Than Abuse or Neglect.
(B)  Prior to the court entering an order to place a minor in the custody of
the Division of Child and Family Services on grounds other than abuse or
neglect, the court shall provide the division with notice of the hearing no
later than five days before the time specified for the hearing so the division
may attend the hearing.
(C)  Prior to committing a child to the custody of the Division of Child and
Family Services, the court shall make a finding as to what reasonable efforts
have been attempted to prevent the child's removal from the child's home.
(d) (i)  The court may commit a minor to the Division of Juvenile Justice
Services for secure confinement.
(ii)  A minor under the jurisdiction of the court solely on the ground of
abuse, neglect, or dependency under Subsection 78A-6-103(1)(c) may not be
committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice Services.
(e)  The court may commit a minor, subject to the court retaining continuing
jurisdiction over the minor, to the temporary custody of the Division of
Juvenile Justice Services for observation and evaluation for a period not to
exceed 45 days, which period may be extended up to 15 days at the request of
the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services.
(f) (i)  The court may commit a minor to a place of detention or an
alternative to detention for a period not to exceed 30 days subject to the
court retaining continuing jurisdiction over the minor.  This commitment may
be stayed or suspended upon conditions ordered by the court.
(ii)  This Subsection (2)(f) applies only to a minor adjudicated for:
(A)  an act which if committed by an adult would be a criminal offense; or
(B)  contempt of court under Section 78A-6-1101.
(g)  The court may vest legal custody of an abused, neglected, or dependent
minor in the Division of Child and Family Services or any other appropriate
person in accordance with the requirements and procedures of Title 78A,
Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings.
(h)  The court may place a minor on a ranch or forestry camp, or similar
facility for care and also for work, if possible, if the person, agency, or
association operating the facility has been approved or has otherwise complied
with all applicable state and local laws.  A minor placed in a forestry camp
or similar facility may be required to work on fire prevention, forestation
and reforestation, recreational works, forest roads, and on other works on or
off the grounds of the facility and may be paid wages, subject to the approval
of and under conditions set by the court.
(i) (i)  The court may order a minor to repair, replace, or otherwise make
restitution for damage or loss caused by the minor's wrongful act, including
costs of treatment as stated in Section 78A-6-321 and impose fines in limited
amounts.
(ii)  The court may also require a minor to reimburse an individual, entity,
or governmental agency who offered and paid a reward to a person or persons
for providing information resulting in a court adjudication that the minor is
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court due to the commission of a
criminal offense.
(iii)  If a minor is returned to this state under the Interstate Compact on
Juveniles, the court may order the minor to make restitution for costs
expended by any governmental entity for the return.
(j)  The court may issue orders necessary for the collection of restitution
and fines ordered by the court, including garnishments, wage withholdings, and
executions.
(k) (i)  The court may through its probation department encourage the
development of employment or work programs to enable minors to fulfill their
obligations under Subsection (2)(i) and for other purposes considered
desirable by the court.
(ii)  Consistent with the order of the court, the probation officer may permit
a minor found to be within the jurisdiction of the court to participate in a
program of work restitution or compensatory service in lieu of paying part or
all of the fine imposed by the court.
(l) (i)  In violations of traffic laws within the court's jurisdiction, the
court may, in addition to any other disposition authorized by this section:
(A)  restrain the minor from driving for periods of time the court considers
necessary; and
(B)  take possession of the minor's driver license.
(ii)  The court may enter any other disposition under Subsection (2)(l)(i);
however, the suspension of driving privileges for an offense under Section
78A-6-606 are governed only by Section 78A-6-606.
(m) (i)  When a minor is found within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court
under Section 78A-6-103 because of violating Section 58-37-8, Title 58,
Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act, or Title 58, Chapter 37b, Imitation
Controlled Substances Act, the court shall, in addition to any fines or fees
otherwise imposed, order that the minor perform a minimum of 20 hours, but no
more than 100 hours, of compensatory service.  Satisfactory completion of an
approved substance abuse prevention or treatment program may be credited by
the court as compensatory service hours.
(ii)  When a minor is found within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court
under Section 78A-6-103 because of a violation of Section 32A-12-209 or
Subsection 76-9-701(1), the court may, upon the first adjudication, and shall,
upon a second or subsequent adjudication, order that the minor perform a
minimum of 20 hours, but no more than 100 hours of compensatory service, in
addition to any fines or fees otherwise imposed.  Satisfactory completion of
an approved substance abuse prevention or treatment program may be credited by
the court as compensatory service hours.
(iii)  When a minor is found within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court
under Section 78A-6-103 because of a violation of Section 76-6-106 or 76-6-206
using graffiti, the court may order the minor to clean up graffiti created by
the minor or any other person at a time and place within the jurisdiction of
the court.  Compensatory service required under this section may be performed
in the presence and under the direct supervision of the minor's parent or
legal guardian.  The parent or legal guardian shall report completion of the
order to the court.  The minor or the minor's parent or legal guardian, if
applicable, shall be responsible for removal costs as determined under Section
76-6-107, unless waived by the court for good cause.  The court may also
require the minor to perform other alternative forms of restitution or repair
to the damaged property pursuant to Subsection 77-18-1(8).
(A)  For a first adjudication, the court may require the minor to clean up
graffiti for not less than eight hours.
(B)  For a second adjudication, the court may require the minor to clean up
graffiti for not less than 16 hours.
(C)  For a third adjudication, the court may require the minor to clean up
graffiti for not less than 24 hours.
(n) (i)  Subject to Subsection (2)(n)(iii), the court may order that a minor:
(A)  be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist, or
psychologist; or
(B)  receive other special care.
(ii)  For purposes of receiving the examination, treatment, or care described
in Subsection (2)(n)(i), the court may place the minor in a hospital or other
suitable facility.
(iii)  In determining whether to order the examination, treatment, or care
described in Subsection (2)(n)(i), the court shall consider:
(A)  the desires of the minor;
(B)  if the minor is under the age of 18, the desires of the parents or
guardian of the minor; and
(C)  whether the potential benefits of the examination, treatment, or care
outweigh the potential risks and side-effects, including behavioral
disturbances, suicidal ideation, brain function impairment, or emotional or
physical harm resulting from the compulsory nature of the examination,
treatment, or care.
(o) (i)  The court may appoint a guardian for the minor if it appears
necessary in the interest of the minor, and may appoint as guardian a public
or private institution or agency in which legal custody of the minor is
vested.
(ii)  In placing a minor under the guardianship or legal custody of an
individual or of a private agency or institution, the court shall give primary
consideration to the welfare of the minor.  When practicable, the court may
take into consideration the religious preferences of the minor and of a
child's parents.
(p) (i)  In support of a decree under Section 78A-6-103, the court may order
reasonable conditions to be complied with by a minor's parents or guardian, a
minor, a minor's custodian, or any other person who has been made a party to
the proceedings.  Conditions may include:
(A)  parent-time by the parents or one parent;
(B)  restrictions on the minor's associates;
(C)  restrictions on the minor's occupation and other activities; and
(D)  requirements to be observed by the parents or custodian.
(ii)  A minor whose parents or guardians successfully complete a family or
other counseling program may be credited by the court for detention,
confinement, or probation time.
(q)  The court may order the child to be committed to the physical custody of
a local mental health authority, in accordance with the procedures and
requirements of Title 62A, Chapter 15, Part 7, Commitment of Persons Under Age
18 to Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.
(r) (i)  The court may make an order committing a minor within the court's
jurisdiction to the Utah State Developmental Center if the minor has mental
retardation in accordance with the provisions of Title 62A, Chapter 5, Part 3,
Admission to Mental Retardation Facility.
(ii)  The court shall follow the procedure applicable in the district courts
with respect to judicial commitments to the Utah State Developmental Center
when ordering a commitment under Subsection (2)(r)(i).
(s)  The court may terminate all parental rights upon a finding of compliance
with the provisions of Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 5, Termination of Parental
Rights Act.
(t)  The court may make any other reasonable orders for the best interest of
the minor or as required for the protection of the public, except that a child
may not be committed to jail or prison.
(u)  The court may combine the dispositions listed in this section if they are
compatible.
(v)  Before depriving any parent of custody, the court shall give due
consideration to the rights of parents concerning their child.  The court may
transfer custody of a minor to another person, agency, or institution in
accordance with the requirements and procedures of Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part
3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings.
(w)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(y)(i), an order under this section
for probation or placement of a minor with an individual or an agency shall
include a date certain for a review of the case by the court.  A new date
shall be set upon each review.
(x)  In reviewing foster home placements, special attention shall be given to
making adoptable children available for adoption without delay.
(y) (i)  The juvenile court may enter an order of permanent custody and
guardianship with an individual or relative of a child where the court has
previously acquired jurisdiction as a result of an adjudication of abuse,
neglect, or dependency.  The juvenile court may enter an order for child
support on behalf of the child against the natural or adoptive parents of the
child.
(ii)  Orders under Subsection (2)(y)(i):
(A)  shall remain in effect until the child reaches majority;
(B)  are not subject to review under Section 78A-6-118; and
(C)  may be modified by petition or motion as provided in Section 78A-6-1103.
(iii)  Orders permanently terminating the rights of a parent, guardian, or
custodian and permanent orders of custody and guardianship do not expire with
a termination of jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(3)  In addition to the dispositions described in Subsection (2), when a minor
comes within the court's jurisdiction, the minor may be given a choice by the
court to serve in the National Guard in lieu of other sanctions, provided:
(a)  the minor meets the current entrance qualifications for service in the
National Guard as determined by a recruiter, whose determination is final;
(b)  the minor is not under the jurisdiction of the court for any act that:
(i)  would be a felony if committed by an adult;
(ii)  is a violation of Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act;
or
(iii)  was committed with a weapon; and
(c)  the court retains jurisdiction over the minor under conditions set by the
court and agreed upon by the recruiter or the unit commander to which the
minor is eventually assigned.
(4) (a)  A DNA specimen shall be obtained from a minor who is under the
jurisdiction of the court as described in Subsection 53-10-403(3).  The
specimen shall be obtained by designated employees of the court or, if the
minor is in the legal custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services,
then by designated employees of the division under Subsection 53-10-404(5)(b).
(b)  The responsible agency shall ensure that employees designated to collect
the saliva DNA specimens receive appropriate training and that the specimens
are obtained in accordance with accepted protocol.
(c)  Reimbursements paid under Subsection 53-10-404(2)(a) shall be placed in
the DNA Specimen Restricted Account created in Section 53-10-407.
(d)  Payment of the reimbursement is second in priority to payments the minor
is ordered to make for restitution under this section and treatment under
Section 78A-6-321.
